src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
taittaat+Hom1: v2_taittaat ; ! taisi, tainu / taitanu
sauttaat+Hom1: v2_sauttaat ;
nokkaanttuut:nokkaantu v2_odd ;
soppeuttuut:soppeutu v2_odd ;
keventtäät:keventä v2_odd ;
rukattaat:rukatta v2_odd ;
avittaat:avitta v2_odd ;
laikottaat:laikotta v2_odd ;
pamattaat:pamatt2a v2_odd ;
vaatettiit:vaatetti v2_odd ;
kostanttaat:kostanta v2_odd ;
vaijenttaat:vaijenta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
isonttaat:isonta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
rakastaat:rakasta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
lunastaat:lunasta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
ikuistaat:ikuista v2_odd ;
unistaat:unista v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
huuđastaat:huuđasta v2_odd ;
vahvistaat:vahvista v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
hiilostaat:hiilosta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
tuohustaat:tuohusta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
priimustaat:priimusta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
vastustaat:vastusta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
krapsattaat:krapsatta v2_odd ;
suututtaat:suututta v2_odd ;
nukattaat:nukatt2a v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
kajattaat:kajatt2a v2_odd ;
unhottaat:unhotta v2_odd ;
oksettaat:oksetta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
painittaat:painitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
rajoittaat:rajoitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
johđattaat:johđatta v2_odd ;
aloittaat:aloitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
rauđoittaat:rauđoitta v2_odd ;
huvittaat:huvitta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
rajottaat:rajotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
pakottaat:pakotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
janottaat:janotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
varottaat:varotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
vistottaat:vistotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
puđottaat:puđotta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
keikuttaat:keikutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
huiskuttaat:huiskutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
hukuttaat:hukutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
kouluttaat:koulutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
paisuttaat:paisutta v2_odd ; ! v2_ta_odd 
sihhuuttaat:sihhuutta v2_odd ;
köpöttäät:köpöttä v2_odd ;
laajenttuut:laajentu v2_odd ;
pahenttuut:pahentu v2_odd ;
kokkonttuut:kokkontu v2_odd ;
pelastuut:pelastu v2_odd ;
tantistuut:tantistu v2_odd ;
unheettuut:unheettu v2_odd ;
rajoittuut+Err/Orth:rajottuut v2_odd ;
villiinttyyt:villiinty v2_odd ;
pöyhistyyt:pöyhisty v2_odd ;
kehittyyt:kehitty v2_odd ;
tyventtäät:tyventä v2_odd ;
käyristäät:käyristä v2_odd ;
miehittäät:miehittä v2_odd ;
kärjittäät:kärjittä v2_odd ;
siivittäät:siivittä v2_odd ;
läksyttäät:läksyttä v2_odd ;
pyrskättäät:pyrskättä v2_odd ;
tiettäät:tie v2_tiettäät ;
hajeskella:hajeskel v3_ele ;
lujeskella:lujeskel v3_ele ;
oleskella:oleskel v3_ele ;
matkustella:matkustel v3_ele ;
pureskella:pureskel v3_ele ;
reviskellä:reviskel v3_ele ;
haavoitella:haavoittel v3_ele ;
koputella:koputtel v3_ele ;
kuvitella:kuvittel v3_ele ;
luuloitella:luuloittel v3_ele ;
nikotella:nikottel v3_ele ;
opiskella:opiskel v3_ele ;
voivotella:voivottel v3_ele ;
marssiskella:marssiskel v3_ele ;
toivoskella:toivoskel v3_ele ;
lađoskella:lađoskel v3_ele ;
kiikuskella:kiikuskel v3_ele ;
nukuskella:nukuskel v3_ele ;
riuđuskella:riuđuskel v3_ele ;
leväskellä:leväskel v3_ele ;
vajelella:vajelel v3_ele ;
puhalella:puhaltel v3_ele ;
käyskenellä:käyskentel v3_ele ;
tehenellä:tehenel v3_ele ;
kevenellä:keventel v3_ele ;
marjastella:marjastel v3_ele ;
maiskutella:maiskuttel v3_ele ;
tarkastella:tarkastel v3_ele ;
kummastella:kummastel v3_ele ;
sairastella:sairastel v3_ele ;
viisastella:viisastel v3_ele ;
hiđastella:hiđastel v3_ele ;
kaffistella:kaffistel v3_ele ;
muikistella:muikistel v3_ele ;
pyyristellä:pyyristel v3_ele ;
kurkistella:kurkistel v3_ele ;
unistella:unistel v3_ele ;
suoristella:suoristel v3_ele ;
höristellä:höristel v3_ele ;
polvistella:polvistel v3_ele ;
irvistellä:irvistel v3_ele ;
puhđistella:puhđistel v3_ele ;
esitellä:esittel v3_ele ;
tieđustella:tieđustel v3_ele ;
rukatella:rukattel v3_ele ;
juđatella:juđattel v3_ele ;
kosketella:koskettel v3_ele ;
syötätellä:syötättel v3_ele ;
asetella:asettel v3_ele ;
käsitellä:käsittel v3_ele ; 
suunnitella:suunnittel v3_ele ;
harjoitella:harjoittel v3_ele ;
sovitella:sovittel v3_ele ;
viekotella:viekottel v3_ele ;
neuvotella:neuvottel v3_ele ;
liikutella:liikuttel v3_ele ;
hullutella:hulluttel v3_ele ;
juoputella:juoputtel v3_ele ;
lohđutella:lohđuttel v3_ele ;
venytellä:venyttel v3_ele ;
röppyytellä:röppyyttel v3_ele ;
leppäätellä:leppäättel v3_ele ;
friiastella:friiastel v3_ele ;
nielä:niel v3_ele_short ;
kuola:kuol v3_ele_short ;
nuola:nuol v3_ele_short ;
vuola:vuol v3_ele_short ;
kuula:kuul v3_ele_short ;
luula:luul v3_ele_short ;
tuula:tuul v3_ele_short ;
